Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska80-329
County board; lease or sell property for use as a veterans home; terms.

Any county board may lease or sell public property to the state for use as a veterans home at such rent and under such terms and conditions as it may deem just and advisable, notwithstanding the fact that such lease or sale is at less than the fair market value of such property.

Laws 1980, LB 184, § 11;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 80-312;

Laws 1997, LB 396, § 18.